Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2268.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8-DHEALTH CARE SITE NEUTRALITYSection 801-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021 "Applicable services." Any of the following:(1) Services provided in an off-campus health care facility.(2) Outpatient evaluation and management services.(3) Any outpatient, diagnostic or imaging service identified by the department under section 804-D."Campus." Any of the following:(1) The primary buildings of a health care facility.(2) The physical area immediately adjacent to the primary buildings or other areas or structures not strictly contiguous to the primary buildings of a health care facility that are located within 250 yards of the main buildings.(3) Any other area determined on an individual basis by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to be part of the campus of a health care facility."Council." The Health Care Cost Containment Council established under the act of July 8, 1986 (P.L.408, No.89), known as the Health Care Cost Containment Act."Current procedural terminology." The codes, descriptions and guidelines as included in the current procedural terminology manual published by the American Medical Association in effect at the time of the effective date of this section."Facility fee." Any fee charged or billed by a health care provider for outpatient services provided in an off-campus health care facility that is:(1) intended to compensate the health care provider for the operational expenses of the health care provider;(2) separate and distinct from a professional fee; and(3) irrespective of the modality through which the health care service was provided.20260HB2268PN2967 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Health benefit plan." A plan, policy, contract, certificate or agreement entered into, offered or issued by a health insurance carrier or third-party administrator acting on behalf of a plan sponsor to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services and includes non-Federal governmental plans as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002(32) (relating to definitions). The term does not include any plans, programs of coverage or benefits administered under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. XVIII (relating to health insurance for aged and disabled)."Health care contract." A contract, agreement or understanding, either orally or in writing, entered into, amended, restated or renewed between a health care provider and any of the following for the delivery of health care services to an enrollee of a health benefit plan:(1) a health insurance carrier;(2) one or more third-party administrators;(3) a plan sponsor; or(4) the health care provider's contractor or agent."Health care facility." For purposes of this chapter, a health care facility includes, but is not limited to, a general, chronic disease or other type of hospital, a home health care agency, a home care agency, a hospice, a long-term care nursing facility, cancer treatment centers using radiation therapy on an ambulatory basis, an ambulatory surgical facility, a birth center regardless of whether such health care facility is operated for profit, nonprofit or by an agency of the Commonwealth or local government. The department shall have the authority to license other health care facilities as may be necessary due to emergence of new modes of health care. When the 20260HB2268PN2967 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department so finds, it shall transmit notice of its intention to license a particular type of health care facility to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin in accordance with the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act. The term does not include an office used primarily for the private practice of a health care practitioner, a program which renders treatment or care for drug or alcohol abuse or dependence unless located within a health facility or a facility providing treatment solely on the basis of prayer or spiritual means. The term does not apply to a facility which is conducted by a religious organization for the purpose of providing health care services exclusively to clergymen or other persons in a religious profession who are members of a religious denomination."Health insurance carrier." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Medical service." As defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.20260HB2268PN2967 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Off-campus health care facility." A facility that is not located on the campus of a health care facility."Participating provider." A provider under contract with a health benefit plan, or one of its delegates, who has agreed under the contract to provide health care services to the health benefit plan's beneficiaries with an expectation of receiving payment, other than coinsurance, copayments or deductibles from the beneficiary, solely from the health care entity under the terms of the contract."Plan sponsor." Any of the following:(1) The employer in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by a single employer.(2) The employee organization in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by an employee organization, provided that "employee organization" shall mean any labor union or any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee, association, group or plan, in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning an employee benefit plan or other matters incidental to employment relationships or any employees' beneficiary association organized for the purpose, in whole or in part, of establishing a plan.(3) In the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by two or more employers or jointly by one or more employers and one or more employee organizations, the association, committee, joint board of trustees or other similar group of representatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan."Professional fee." Any fee charged or billed by a provider 20260HB2268PN2967 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for professional medical services provided in a health care facility."Third-party administrator." A health plan administrator who acts on behalf of a plan sponsor to administer a health benefit plan.Section 802-D. Prohibited fees and provider reimbursement.(a) Prohibited fees.--A health care provider may not charge, bill or collect a facility fee for any applicable service.(b) Participating provider reimbursement rates.--A health care provider that enters into a health care contract to be a participating provider with a health benefit plan shall offer to accept as payment in full for applicable services rates that shall not exceed 150% of the amount paid by Medicare for the same services.(c) Health care provider reimbursement rates.--(1) A health care provider may not charge, bill or accept payment for an applicable service that exceeds the lesser of:(i) 150% of the amount paid by Medicare; or(ii) the negotiated rate agreed upon by the health care provider and the health benefit plan.(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply to any individual or entity that reimburses for applicable services, including self-pay individuals and health benefit plans that do not have an existing contract with the health care provider.(d) Contract provisions.--A health care contract entered into with a health care provider shall include provisions requiring that:(1) the health benefit plan shall not reimburse a health care provider for any applicable services in amounts in 20260HB2268PN2967 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 excess of the rates specified in subsections (b) and (c) or for facility fees prohibited by subsection (a); and(2) a beneficiary or self-pay individual shall not be liable to any health care provider for any amounts in excess of the rates specified in subsections (b) and (c) or for facility fees prohibited under subsection (a), including any copayments, deductibles or coinsurance for any portion of the prohibited rates.Section 803-D. Duties of health care provider.(a) Notice requirement.--A health care provider shall provide written notice to the patient at least 48 hours before the performance of medical services, including diagnosis, care or treatment in an off-campus health care facility of:(1) the dollar amount of the patient's potential financial liability, if known; or(2) if the diagnosis and the extent of medical services is unknown within the 48-hour period, a statement advising the patient or the patient's authorized representative that the patient may incur a financial liability to the health care facility that the patient would not incur if the patient was receiving medical services and treatment on the campus of the health care facility; and(3) a statement advising the patient, or the patient's authorized representative, that the patient's actual financial liability is based on the medical services rendered by the health care facility.(b) Method of notice.--(1) A health care provider must provide written notice required under subsection (a) in a method that the patient can understand.20260HB2268PN2967 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A health care provider must provide the notice required under subsection (a) to the patient's authorized representative at least 48 hours prior to the delivery of medical services to the patient if the patient is unconscious, under significant duress or otherwise unable to read, comprehend or act on the patient's own behalf.(3) A health care provider must provide the notice required under subsection (a) as soon as possible after the existence of an emergency has been ruled out or the emergency condition has been stabilized in situations where an off-campus health care facility provides examination or treatment.(c) Provider-based status notice.--A health care provider shall provide written notice to a patient or the patient's authorized representative under 42 CFR 413.65(g)(7)(iii) (relating to requirements for a determination that a facility or an organization has provider-based status).Section 804-D. Identification of medical services.The department shall annually identify medical services subject to the limitations on facility fees provided in section 802-D and submit the list of identified medical services to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 805-D. Reporting requirements.(a) Submissions.--Each health care provider shall submit to the council an annual report concerning facility fees billed during the preceding calendar year. The report under this paragraph shall be in a format as determined by the council. The council shall submit the report to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the 20260HB2268PN2967 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Report content.--A report under subsection (a) shall include the following:(1) The name and full address of each health care facility owned or operated by the health care provider that provides medical services for which a facility fee is charged or billed.(2) The number of patient visits at each health care facility for which a facility fee was charged or billed.(3) The number, total amount and types of allowable facility fees paid at each health care facility by Medicare, Medicaid and private insurance.(4) For each health care facility and the health care provider, the total amount billed and the total revenue received from facility fees.(5) The 10 most frequent procedures or services, identified by current procedural terminology category I codes, provided by the health care provider that generated the largest amount of facility fee gross revenue, including:(i) The volume of each procedure or service under this paragraph.(ii) The gross and net revenue totals for each procedure or service under this paragraph.(iii) The total net amount of revenue received by the health care provider derived from facility fees for each procedure or service under this paragraph.(6) The 10 most frequent procedures or services, identified by current procedural terminology category I codes, based on patient volume, provided by the health care provider for which facility fees are billed or charged based 20260HB2268PN2967 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on patient volume, including the gross and net revenue totals received for each such procedure or service.(7) Any other information related to facility fees the council may require.Section 806-D. Regulatory authorization.The council may promulgate regulations necessary to implement this chapter, specify the format and content of reports and impose penalties for noncompliance consistent with the council's authority under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 33 (relating to health care cost containment).Section 807-D. Enforcement.(a) Compliance enforcement.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the department shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall adopt and promulgate regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.(b) Penalty.--A health care provider or health care facility that fails to provide notice under section 803-A and supply data required under section 805-A may be subject to the penalty under 35 Pa.C.S. § 3310(b) (relating to enforcement and penalty).(c) Audit.--The department, or a designee, may audit any health care provider for compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Each health care provider shall make available, upon written request of the department or a designee, a copy of any books, documents, records or data necessary for the audit under this subsection for a period of four years after the furnishing of any services for which a facility fee was charged, billed or collected.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2268PN2967 - 10 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728